src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-vwtiim_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../generator-gt-norm.hfstol
    Morph: ../../analyser-gt-norm.hfstol
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - võțīm: # Noun 154 'eng /est võti/fin' - full paradigm
     võțīm+N+Sg+Nom: võțīm
     võțīm+N+Sg+Gen: võțīm
     võțīm+N+Sg+Par: võțīmt
     võțīm+N+Sg+Dat: võțīmõn
     võțīm+N+Sg+Ins: võțīmõks
     võțīm+N+Sg+Ill: võțīmõ
     võțīm+N+Sg+Ela: võțīmõst
     võțīm+N+Pl+Nom: võțmõd
     võțīm+N+Pl+Gen: võțmõd
     võțīm+N+Pl+Par: võțmidi
     võțīm+N+Pl+Dat: võțmõdõn
     võțīm+N+Pl+Ins: võțmõdõks
     võțīm+N+Pl+Ill: võțmiž
     võțīm+N+Pl+Ela: võțmist
